Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2515.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.305, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) "Legislative commission" means a joint commission, committee, or other entity in the legislative branch composed exclusively of members of the senate and the house of representatives. (b) "Joint offices" means the Revisor of Statutes, Legislative Reference Library, the Office of Legislative Auditor, the Legislative Budget Office,new text begin Legislative Coordinating Commission,new text end and any other joint legislative service office.